California statutes. Penal Code
(a) The person in charge of any secure detention facility, including, but not limited to, a prison, a juvenile hall, a county jail, or any institution under the jurisdiction of the California Youth Authority, shall promptly notify the chief of police of the city in which the facility is located, or the sheriff of the county if the facility is located in an unincorporated area, of an escape by a person in its custody.

(b) The person in charge of any secure detention facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections or the Department of the Youth Authority shall release the name of, and any descriptive information about, any person who has escaped from custody to other law enforcement agencies, or to other persons if the release of the information would be necessary to assist in recapturing the person or to protect the public from substantial physical harm.

(c) In addition to the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), in cases of escape by persons in the custody of the Department of Corrections who have been convicted of a felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 or who have effected the escape by force or violence as proscribed by subdivision (a) of Section 4530, prompt notification shall be given to the newspapers of general circulation within the county in which the escape occurred, and to television stations regularly broadcasting news into and within the county, accompanied by a photograph and description of the escapee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Rescues [4550. - 4550.]

4550.

Every person who rescues or attempts to rescue, or aids another person in rescuing or attempting to rescue any prisoner from any prison, or prison road camp or any jail or county road camp, or from any officer or person having him or her in lawful custody, is punishable as follows:

(a) If the prisoner was in custody upon a conviction of a felony punishable with death, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three or four years.

(b) If the prisoner was in custody otherwise than as specified in subdivision (a), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by imprisonment in the county jail not to
 exceed one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 490.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Unauthorized Communications With Prisons and Prisoners [4570. - 4577.]

4570.

Every person who, without the permission of the warden or other officer in charge of any State prison, or prison road camp, or prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or prison farm or any other place where prisoners of the State prison are located under the custody of prison officials, officers or employees, or any jail, or any county road camp in this State, communicates with any prisoner or person detained therein, or brings therein or takes therefrom any letter, writing, literature, or reading matter to or from any prisoner or person confined therein, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 108.)
-------------------------------------------

4570.1.

Every person who, without permission of the peace officer or corrections officer in charge of any vehicle, bus, van or automobile used for the transportation of prisoners, delivers a written communication to any prisoner or person detained therein, or being escorted to or from that vehicle, or takes from or gives to the prisoner any item, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1134, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4570.5.

Every person who falsely indentifies himself either verbally or by presenting any fraudulent written instrument to prison officials, officers, or employees of any state prison, prison road camp, or prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or prison farm, or any jail, or any county industrial farm, or any county road camp, for the purpose of securing admission to the premises or grounds of any such prison, camp, farm, or jail, and such person would not otherwise qualify for admission, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 424.)
-------------------------------------------

4571.

Every person who, having been previously convicted of a felony and confined in any State prison in this State, without the consent of the warden or other officer in charge of any State prison or prison road camp, or prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or prison farm or any other place where prisoners of the State prison are located under the custody of prison officials, officers or employees, or any jail or any county road camp in this State, comes upon the grounds of any such institution, or lands belonging or adjacent thereto, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 108.)
-------------------------------------------

4573.

(a) Except when otherwise authorized by law, or when authorized by the person in charge of the prison or other institution referred to in this section or by an officer of the institution empowered by the person in charge of the institution to give the authorization, any person, who knowingly brings or sends into, or knowingly assists in bringing into, or sending into, any state prison, prison road camp, prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or prison farm or any other place where prisoners of the state are located under the custody of prison officials, officers or employees, or into any county, city and county, or city jail, road camp, farm or other place where prisoners or inmates are located under custody of any sheriff, chief of police,
 peace officer, probation officer or employees, or within the grounds belonging to the institution, any controlled substance, the possession of which is prohibited by Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, any device, contrivance, instrument, or paraphernalia intended to be used for unlawfully injecting or consuming a controlled substance, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years.

(b) The prohibitions and sanctions addressed in this section shall be clearly and prominently posted outside of, and at the entrance to, the grounds of all detention facilities under the jurisdiction of, or operated by, the state or any city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 491.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4573.5.

Any person who knowingly brings into any state prison or other institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections, or into any prison camp, prison farm, or any other place where prisoners or inmates of these institutions are located under the custody of prison or institution officials, officers, or employees, or into any county, city and county, or city jail, road camp, farm or any other institution or place where prisoners or inmates are being held under the custody of any sheriff, chief of police, peace officer, probation officer, or employees, or within the grounds belonging to any institution or place, any alcoholic beverage, any drugs, other than controlled substances, in any manner, shape, form, dispenser, or container, or any device, contrivance, instrument, or paraphernalia intended to be used for unlawfully injecting or consuming any drug other than controlled substances, without having authority so to do by the rules of the Department of Corrections, the rules of the prison, institution, camp, farm, place, or jail, or by the specific authorization of the warden, superintendent, jailer, or other person in charge of the prison, jail, institution, camp, farm, or place, is guilty of a felony.

The prohibitions and sanctions addressed in this section shall be clearly and prominently posted outside of, and at the entrance to, the grounds of all detention facilities under the jurisdiction of, or operated by, the state or any city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1580, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4573.6.

(a) Any person who knowingly has in his or her possession in any state prison, prison road camp, prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or prison farm or any place where prisoners of the state are located under the custody of prison officials, officers, or employees, or in any county, city and county, or city jail, road camp, farm, or any place or institution, where prisoners or inmates are being held under the custody of any sheriff, chief of police, peace officer, probation officer, or employees, or within the grounds belonging to any jail, road camp, farm, place or institution, any controlled substances, the possession of which is prohibited by Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, any device,
 contrivance, instrument, or paraphernalia intended to be used for unlawfully injecting or consuming controlled substances, without being authorized to so possess the same by the rules of the Department of Corrections, rules of the prison or jail, institution, camp, farm or place, or by the specific authorization of the warden, superintendent, jailer, or other person in charge of the prison, jail, institution, camp, farm or place, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years.

(b) The prohibitions and sanctions addressed in this section shall be clearly and prominently posted outside of, and at the entrance to, the grounds of all detention facilities under the jurisdiction of, or operated by, the state or any city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 492.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4573.8.

Any person who knowingly has in his or her possession in any state prison, prison road camp, prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or prison farm or any place where prisoners of the state are located under the custody of prison officials, officers, or employees, or in any county, city and county, or city jail, road camp, farm, or any place or institution, where prisoners or inmates are being held under the custody of any sheriff, chief of police, peace officer, probation officer, or employees, or within the grounds belonging to any jail, road camp, farm, place, or institution, drugs in any manner, shape, form, dispenser, or container, any device, contrivance, instrument, or paraphernalia intended to be used for unlawfully injecting or consuming drugs, or alcoholic beverages, without being authorized to possess the same by rules of the Department of Corrections, rules of the prison or jail, institution, camp, farm, or place, or by the specific authorization of the warden, superintendent, jailer, or other person in charge of the prison, jail, institution, camp, farm, or place, is guilty of a felony.

The prohibitions and sanctions addressed in this section shall be clearly and prominently posted outside of, and at the entrance to, the grounds of all detention facilities under the jurisdiction of, or operated by, the state or any city, county, or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1580, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

4573.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person, other than a person held in custody, who sells, furnishes, administers, or gives away, or offers to sell, furnish, administer, or give away to any person held in custody in any state prison or other institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections, or in any prison camp, prison farm, or any other place where prisoners or inmates of these institutions are located under the custody of prison institution officials, officers, or employees, or in any county, city and county, or city jail, road camp, farm, or any other institution or place where prisoners or inmates are being held under the custody of any sheriff, chief of police, peace officer, probation officer, or
 employees, or within the grounds belonging to any institution or place, any controlled substance, the possession of which is prohibited by Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, if the recipient is not authorized to possess the same by the rules of the Department of Corrections, rules of the prison or jail, institution, camp, farm, or place, or by the specific authorization of the warden, superintendent, jailer, or other person in charge of the prison, jail, institution, camp, farm, or place, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, four, or six years.

(b) The prohibitions and sanctions addressed in this section shall be clearly and prominently posted outside of, and at the entrance to, the grounds of all detention facilities under the jurisdiction of, or operated by, the state or any city, county, or city and
 county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 493.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4574.

(a) Except when otherwise authorized by law, or when authorized by the person in charge of the prison or other institution referred to in this section or by an officer of the institution empowered by the person in charge of the institution to give such authorization, any person, who knowingly brings or sends into, or knowingly assists in bringing into, or sending into, any state prison or prison road camp or prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or prison farm or any other place where prisoners of the state prison are located under the custody of prison officials, officers or employees, or any jail or any county road camp in this state, or within the grounds belonging or adjacent to any such institution, any firearms, deadly weapons, or
 explosives, and any person who, while lawfully confined in a jail or county road camp possesses therein any firearm, deadly weapon, explosive, tear gas or tear gas weapon, is guilty of a felony and punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), any person who knowingly brings or sends into those places any tear gas or tear gas weapons which results in the release of such tear gas or use of such weapon is guilty of a felony and punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (a), any person who knowingly brings or sends into those places any tear gas or tear gas weapons is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by fine not exceeding
 one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 494.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4575.

(a) Any person in a local correctional facility who possesses a wireless communication device, including, but not limited to, a cellular telephone, pager, or wireless Internet device, who is not authorized to possess that item is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) Any person housed in a local correctional facility who possesses any tobacco products in any form, including snuff products, smoking paraphernalia, any device that is intended to be used for ingesting or consuming tobacco, or any container or dispenser used for any of those products, is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(c) Money collected pursuant to this section shall be placed into the inmate welfare fund, as specified in Section 4025.

(d) Any person housed in a local correctional facility who possesses a handcuff key who is not authorized to possess that item is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. As used in this subdivision, “handcuff key” means any device designed or intended to open or unlatch a handcuff.

(e) Subdivision (b) shall only apply to a person in a local correctional facility in a county in which the board of supervisors has adopted an ordinance or passed a resolution banning tobacco in its correctional facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4576.

(a) Except as otherwise authorized by law, or when authorized by either the person in charge of the prison or other institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or an officer of the institution empowered to give that authorization, a person who possesses with the intent to deliver, or delivers, to an inmate or ward in the custody of the department any cellular telephone or other wireless communication device or any component thereof, including, but not limited to, a subscriber identity module (SIM card) or memory storage device, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each device, or both that fine and
 imprisonment.

(b) (1) If a person visiting an inmate or ward in the custody of the department, upon being searched or subjected to a metal detector, is found to be in possession of a cellular telephone or other wireless communication device or any component thereof, including, but not limited to, a SIM card or memory storage device, that device or component shall be subject to confiscation but shall be returned on the same day the person visits the inmate or ward, unless the cellular telephone or other wireless communication device or any component thereof is held as evidence in a case where the person is cited for a violation of subdivision (a).

(2) If, upon investigation, it is determined that no prosecution will take place, the cellular telephone or other wireless communication device or any component thereof shall be returned to the owner at the owner’s
 expense.

(3) Notice of this provision shall be posted in all areas where visitors are searched prior to visitation with an inmate or ward in the custody of the department.

(c) Any inmate who is found to be in possession of a wireless communication device shall be subject to time credit denial or loss of up to 90 days.

(d) A person who brings, without authorization, a wireless communication device within the secure perimeter of any prison or institution housing offenders under the jurisdiction of the department is deemed to have given his or her consent to the department using available technology to prevent that wireless device from sending or receiving telephone calls or other forms of electronic communication. Notice of this provision shall be posted at all public entry gates of the prison or institution.

(e) The department shall not access data or communications that have been captured using available technology from unauthorized use of a wireless communication device except after obtaining a valid search warrant.

(f) The department shall not capture data or communications from an authorized wireless communication device, except as already authorized under existing law.

(g) The department shall not access data or communications that have been captured using available technology from an authorized wireless communication device, except as already authorized under existing law.

(h) If the available technology to prevent wireless communications from sending and receiving telephone calls or other forms of electronic communication extends beyond the secure
 perimeter of the prison or institution, the department shall take all reasonable actions to correct the problem.

(i) Any contractor or employee of a contractor or the department who knowingly and willfully, without authorization, obtains, discloses, or uses confidential information in violation of subdivision (e), (f), or (g) shall be subject to an administrative fine or civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a first violation, or ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a second violation, or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a third or subsequent violation.

(j) Nothing in this section prohibits the department from obtaining electronic communications that the department could have lawfully obtained prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 26)   Effective October 6, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4577.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), a person who knowingly and intentionally operates an unmanned aircraft system on or above the grounds of a state prison, a jail, or a juvenile hall, camp, or ranch is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) This section does not apply to a person employed by the prison who operates the unmanned aircraft system within the scope of his or her employment, or a person who receives prior permission
 from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to operate the unmanned aircraft system over the prison.

(c) This section does not apply to a person employed by the jail who operates the unmanned aircraft system within the scope of his or her employment, or a person who receives prior permission from the county sheriff to operate the unmanned aircraft system over the jail.

(d) This section does not apply to a person employed by the county department that operates the juvenile hall, camp, or ranch who operates the unmanned aircraft system within the scope of his or her employment, or a person who receives prior permission from the county department that operates the juvenile hall, camp, or ranch to operate the unmanned aircraft system over the juvenile hall, camp, or
 ranch.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Unmanned aircraft” means an aircraft that is operated without
 the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft.

(2) “Unmanned aircraft system” means an unmanned aircraft and associated elements, including, but not limited to, communication links and the components that control the unmanned aircraft that are required for the pilot in command to operate safely and efficiently in the national airspace system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 333, Sec. 1.   (SB 1355)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Demolishing Prisons and Jails [4600. - 4600.]

4600.

(a) Every person who willfully and intentionally breaks down, pulls down, or otherwise destroys or injures any jail, prison, or any public property in any jail or prison, is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, except that where the damage or injury to any city, city and county, or county jail property or prison property is determined to be nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or less, that person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) In any case in which a person is convicted of violating this section, the court may order the defendant to make restitution to the public entity that owns the property damaged by the defendant. The court shall
 specify in the order that the public entity that owns the property damaged by the defendant shall not enforce the order until the defendant satisfies all outstanding fines, penalties, assessments, restitution fines, and restitution orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 495.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Trials of Prisoners [4700.1. - 4703.]

4700.1.

For any trial or hearing referred to in Section 4750, the sheriff of the county where such trial or hearing is had and the person in charge of the prison may agree that the county shall transport prisoners in a state prison to and from such prison. Upon such agreement, the county, and not the Department of Corrections, shall perform the transportation referred to in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1310, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

4701.

The jurisdiction of a criminal action for escaping from any State prison is in any county of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

4702.

Whenever any prisoner confined in a jail established and maintained by the sheriff in another county, is tried for any offense committed in such jail or for escaping or attempting to escape therefrom, the venue shall be in the county establishing and maintaining such jail and the costs shall be charged against that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

4703.

With the concurrence of the Attorney General, the district attorney may transfer the responsibility for the prosecution of any crime committed by prisoners in physical custody in the state prisons in the district attorney’s county. As used in this section, crimes committed while in physical custody shall include escapes and attempted escapes but shall not include any crimes committed while a prisoner has been conditionally released from state prison on work furlough, parole, or upon any other conditional release where the inmate is in constructive but not actual physical custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 147, Sec. 3.   Effective April 5, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Local Expenses [4750. - 4758.]

4750.

A city, county, or superior court shall be entitled to reimbursement for reasonable and necessary costs connected with state prisons or prisoners in connection with any of the following:

(a) Any crime committed at a state prison, whether by a prisoner, employee, or other person.

With respect to a prisoner, “crime committed at a state prison” as used in this subdivision, includes, but is not limited to, crimes committed by the prisoner while detained in local facilities as a result of a transfer pursuant to Section 2910 or 6253, or in conjunction with any hearing, proceeding, or other activity for which reimbursement is otherwise provided by this section.

(b) Any crime committed by a prisoner in furtherance of an escape. Any crime committed by an escaped prisoner within 10 days after the escape and within 100 miles of the facility from which the escape occurred shall be presumed to have been a crime committed in furtherance of an escape.

(c) Any hearing on any return of a writ of habeas corpus prosecuted by or on behalf of a prisoner.

(d) Any trial or hearing on the question of the sanity of a prisoner.

(e) Any costs not otherwise reimbursable under Section 1557 or any other related provision in connection with any extradition proceeding for any prisoner released to hold.

(f) Any costs incurred by a coroner in connection with the death of a
 prisoner.

(g) Any costs incurred in transporting a prisoner within the host county or as requested by the prison facility or incurred for increased security while a prisoner is outside a state prison.

(h) Any crime committed by a state inmate at a state hospital for the care, treatment, and education of the mentally disordered, as specified in Section 7200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(i) Commencing January 1, 2012, any nontreatment costs described in subdivision (b) of Section 4117 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(j) No city, county, or other jurisdiction may file, and the state may not reimburse, a claim pursuant to this section that is presented to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or to any other agency or department of
 the state more than six months after the close of the month in which the costs were incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 660, Sec. 1.   (AB 1016)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4751.

Costs incurred by a city or county include all of the following:

(a) Costs of law enforcement agencies in connection with any matter set forth in Section 4750, including the investigation or evaluation of any of those matters regardless of whether a crime has in fact occurred, a hearing held, or an offense prosecuted.

(b) Costs of participation in any trial or hearing of any matter set forth in Section 4750, including costs for the preparation for the trial, pretrial hearing, actual trial or hearing, expert witness fees, the costs of guarding or keeping the prisoner, the transportation of the prisoner, the costs of appeal, and the execution of the sentence. The cost of detention in a city or county correctional facility shall include the same cost factors as are utilized by the Department of Corrections in determining the cost of prisoner care in state correctional facilities.

(c) The costs of the prosecuting attorney in investigating, evaluating, or prosecuting cases related to any matter set forth in Section 4750, whether or not the prosecuting attorney decides to commence legal action.

(d) Costs incurred by the public defender or court-appointed attorney with respect to any matter set forth in Section 4750.

(e) Any costs incurred for providing training in the investigation or prosecution associated with any matter set forth in Section 4750.

(f) Any other costs reasonably incurred by a county in connection with any matter set forth in Section 4750.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4751.5.

Costs incurred by a superior court include all of the following:

(a) Costs of any trial or hearing of any matter set forth in Section 4750, including costs for the preparation of the trial, pretrial hearing, and the actual trial or hearing.

(b) Any other costs reasonably incurred by a superior court in connection with any matter set forth in Section 4750.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 85.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4752.

As used in this chapter, reasonable and necessary costs shall be based upon all operating costs, including the cost of elected officials, except superior court judges, while serving in line functions and including all administrative costs associated with providing the necessary services and securing reimbursement therefor. Administrative costs include a proportional allowance for overhead determined in accordance with current accounting practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 86.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4753.

A city or county shall designate an officer or agency to prepare a statement of costs that shall be reimbursed under this chapter.

The statement shall be sent to the Controller for approval. The statement may not include any costs that are incurred by a superior court, as described in Section 4751.5. The Controller shall reimburse the city or county within 60 days after receipt of the statement or provide a written statement as to the reason for not making reimbursement at that time. If sufficient funds are not available, the Controller shall request the Director of Finance to include any amounts necessary to satisfy the claims in a request for a deficiency appropriation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 87.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4753.5.

A superior court shall prepare a statement of costs that shall be reimbursed under this chapter. The state may not include any costs that are incurred by a city or county, as described in Section 4751. The statement shall be sent to the Administrative Office of the Courts for approval and reimbursement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 88.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4754.

As used in this chapter, “prisoner” means any person committed to a state prison, including a person who has been transferred to any other facility, has escaped, or is otherwise absent, but does not include a person while on parole.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1310, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

4755.

Whenever a person has entered upon a term of imprisonment in a penal or correctional institution, and whenever during the continuance of the term of imprisonment there is a detainer lodged against the prisoner by a law enforcement or prosecutorial agency of the state or its subdivisions, the Department of Corrections may do either of the following:

(a) Release the inmate to the agency lodging the detainer, within five days, or five court days if the law enforcement agency lodging the detainer is more than 400 miles from the county in which the institution is located, prior to the scheduled release date provided the inmate is kept in custody until the scheduled release date.

(b) Retain the inmate in custody up to five days, or five court days if the law enforcement agency lodging the detainer is more than 400 miles from the county in which the institution is located, after the scheduled release date to facilitate pickup by the agency lodging the detainer.

If a person has been retained in custody under this subdivision in response to the issuance of a warrant of arrest charging a particular offense and the defendant is released from custody following the retention period without pickup by the agency lodging the detainer, a subsequent court order shall be issued before the arrest of that person for the same offense which was charged in the prior warrant.

As used in this section “detainer” means a warrant of arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1303, Sec. 7.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

4758.

(a) A county shall be entitled to reimbursement for reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the county with respect to an inmate housed and treated at a state hospital in that county pursuant to Section 2684, including, but not limited to, any trial costs related to a crime committed at the hospital by an inmate housed at the hospital.

(b) Where an inmate referred for treatment to a state hospital pursuant to Section 2684 commits a crime during transportation from prison to the hospital, or commits a crime during transportation from the hospital to the prison, a county that prosecutes the defendant shall be entitled to reimbursement for the costs of prosecution.

(c) No city, county, or other jurisdiction may file, and the state may not reimburse, a claim pursuant to this section that is presented to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or to any other agency or department of the state more than six months after the close of the month in which the costs were incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 11.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 6. REPRIEVES, PARDONS AND COMMUTATIONS [4800. - 4906.]



  CHAPTER 1. Powers and Duties of Governor [4800. - 4813.]

4800.

The general authority to grant reprieves, pardons and commutations of sentence is conferred upon the Governor by Section 8 of Article V of the Constitution of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

4801.

(a) The Board of Parole Hearings may report to the Governor, from time to time, the names of any and all persons imprisoned in any state prison who, in its judgment, ought to have a commutation of sentence or be pardoned and set at liberty on account of good conduct, or unusual term of sentence, or any other cause, including evidence of intimate partner battering and its effects. For purposes of this section, “intimate partner battering and its effects” may include evidence of the nature and effects of physical, emotional, or mental abuse upon the beliefs, perceptions, or behavior of victims of domestic violence if it appears the criminal behavior was the result of that victimization.

(b) (1) The board, in reviewing a prisoner’s suitability for parole pursuant to Section 3041.5, shall give great weight to any information or evidence that, at the time of the commission of the crime, the prisoner had experienced intimate partner battering, but was convicted of an offense that occurred prior to August 29, 1996. The board shall state on the record the information or evidence that it considered pursuant to this subdivision, and the reasons for the parole decision. The board shall annually report to the Legislature and the Governor on the cases the board considered pursuant to this subdivision during the previous year, including the board’s decisions and the specific and detailed findings of its investigations of these cases.

(2) The report for the Legislature to be submitted pursuant to paragraph
 (1) shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) The fact that a prisoner has presented evidence of intimate partner battering cannot be used to support a finding that the prisoner lacks insight into his or her crime and its causes.

(c) When a prisoner committed his or her controlling offense, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 3051, when he or she was 25 years of age or younger, the board, in reviewing a prisoner’s suitability for parole pursuant to Section 3041.5, shall give great weight to the diminished culpability of youth as compared to adults, the hallmark features of youth, and any subsequent growth and increased maturity of the prisoner in accordance with relevant case law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 684, Sec. 2.5.   (SB 394)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4802.

In the case of a person twice convicted of felony, the application for pardon or commutation of sentence shall be made directly to the Governor, who shall transmit all papers and documents relied upon in support of and in opposition to the application to the Board of Parole Hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 437, Sec. 2.   (AB 648)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4802.5.

The Governor shall make the application for a pardon and the application for a commutation available on the Governor’s Office Internet Web site and all applications for a direct pardon received by the Governor shall be promptly forwarded to the Board of Parole Hearings for an investigation and recommendation to the Governor. Applications supported by a certificate of rehabilitation may be granted by the Governor without investigation and recommendation by the
 Board of Parole Hearings in accordance with Section 4852.16.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 824, Sec. 3.   (AB 2845)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4803.
